Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201620-504
Written racial profiling prevention policy; contents; Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice; powers; duties; records maintained; immunity; law enforcement officer, prosecutor,
defense attorney, or probation officer; report required.

(1) On or before January 1, 2014, the Nebraska State Patrol,
the county sheriffs, all city and village police departments, and any other
law enforcement agency in this state shall adopt and provide a copy to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice of a written policy that prohibits the detention
of any person or a motor vehicle stop when such action is motivated by racial
profiling. Such racial profiling
prevention policy shall include definitions consistent with section 20-503
and one or more internal methods of prevention and enforcement, including,
but not limited to:

(a) Internal
affairs investigation;

(b) Preventative measures including extra training at the Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center focused on avoidance of apparent or actual
racial profiling;

(c) Early intervention with any particular personnel determined
by the administration of the agency to have committed, participated in, condoned,
or attempted to cover up any instance of racial profiling; and

(d) Disciplinary
measures or other formal or informal methods of prevention and enforcement.

None of the
preventative or enforcement measures shall be implemented contrary to the
collective-bargaining agreement provisions or personnel rules under which
the member or officer in question is employed.

(2) The Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice may develop and distribute a suggested
model written racial profiling prevention policy for use by law enforcement
agencies, but the commission shall not mandate the adoption of the model policy
except for any particular law enforcement agency which fails to timely create
and provide to the commission a policy for the agency in conformance with
the minimum standards set forth in this section.

(3) With respect to a motor vehicle stop, on
and after January 1, 2002, the Nebraska State Patrol, the county sheriffs,
all city and village police departments, and any other law enforcement agency
in this state shall record and retain the following information using the
form developed and promulgated pursuant to section 20-505:

(a) The number of motor vehicle stops;

(b) The characteristics of race or ethnicity of the person
stopped. The identification of such characteristics shall be based on the
observation and perception of the law enforcement officer responsible for
reporting the motor vehicle stop and the information shall not be required
to be provided by the person stopped;

(c) If the stop is for a law violation, the nature of the
alleged law violation that resulted in the motor vehicle stop;

(d) Whether a warning or citation was issued, an arrest made,
or a search conducted as a result of the motor vehicle stop. Search does not
include a search incident to arrest or an inventory search; and

(e) Any additional information that the Nebraska State Patrol,
the county sheriffs, all city and village police departments, or any other
law enforcement agency in this state, as the case may be, deems appropriate.

(4) The Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice may develop a uniform system for receiving
allegations of racial profiling. The Nebraska State Patrol, the county sheriffs,
all city and village police departments, and any other law enforcement agency
in this state shall provide to the commission (a) a copy of each allegation
of racial profiling received and (b) written notification of the review and
disposition of such allegation. No information revealing the identity of the
law enforcement officer involved in the stop shall be used, transmitted, or
disclosed in violation of any collective-bargaining agreement provision or
personnel rule under which such law enforcement officer is employed. No information
revealing the identity of the complainant shall be used, transmitted, or disclosed
in the form alleging racial profiling.

(5) Any law enforcement officer
who in good faith records information on a motor vehicle stop pursuant to
this section shall not be held civilly liable for the act of recording such
information unless the law enforcement officer's conduct was unreasonable
or reckless or in some way contrary to law.

(6) On or before October 1,
2002, and annually thereafter, the
Nebraska State Patrol, the county sheriffs, all city and village police departments,
and all other law enforcement agencies in this state shall provide to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, in
such form as the commission prescribes, a summary report of the information
recorded pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

(7) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice shall, within the limits of its existing
appropriations, including any
grant funds which the commission is awarded for such purpose, provide
for an annual review and analysis of the prevalence
and disposition of motor vehicle stops based on racial profiling and allegations of racial profiling involved in other
detentions reported pursuant to this section. After the review and analysis, the commission may, when
it deems warranted, inquire into and study individual law enforcement agency
circumstances in which the raw data collected and analyzed raises at least
some issue or appearance of possible racial profiling. The commission may
make recommendations to any such law enforcement agency for the purpose of
improving measures to prevent racial profiling or the appearance of racial
profiling. The results of such review, analysis, inquiry, and study and any recommendations by
the commission to any law enforcement agency shall be reported
annually to the Governor and the Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature shall
be submitted electronically.

(8) Any law enforcement
officer, prosecutor, defense attorney, or probation officer, unless restricted
by privilege, who becomes aware of incidents of racial profiling by a law
enforcement agency, shall report such incidents to the Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice within thirty days after becoming
aware of such practice.

Laws 2001, LB 593, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 1162, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB746, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 21;

Laws 2013, LB99, § 3.